New Jersey, session 222, S1542.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.23:10-19 is amended to read as follows: 23:10-19.    [All]  a.  (1) Except as otherwise provided by paragraph (2) of this subsection, or by any other law, any moneys recovered for [violations] a violation of this Title, or any provision of [any] law supplementary thereto, or any provision of the State Fish and Game Code shall [, except as otherwise specifically provided,] be paid , in full, to the Division of Fish and [Game] Wildlife for its use and purposes. (2)   Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, whenever a court action is undertaken in the municipal court of a small municipality, which court action results in the recovery of moneys for a violation of this Title, any provision of law supplementary thereto, or any provision of the State Fish and Game Code, 50 percent of the moneys recovered for the violation shall be paid to the Division of Fish and Wildlife for its use and purposes, and the remaining 50 percent of recovered moneys shall be paid to the governing body of the small municipality in which the court action took place, for the use and purposes of the municipality. b.    Except where prohibited by federal law, whenever a court action is undertaken in the municipal court of a small municipality, which court action results in the recovery of moneys for a violation of a federal fish and game law or regulation, 50 percent of the recovered moneys shall be paid to the Division of Fish and Wildlife, for its use and purposes, and the remaining 50 percent of recovered moneys shall be paid to the governing body of the municipality in which the court action took place, for the use and purposes of the municipality.  In all other cases, and unless prohibited by federal law, any penalty moneys recovered for a violation of a federal fish and game law or regulation shall be paid, in full, to the Division of Fish and Wildlife, for its use and purposes. c.     Any court official or other authorized person [receiving such] who receives moneys that have been recovered for [violations] a violation of this Title, [or] any provision of [any] law supplementary thereto, or any provision of the State Fish and Game Code, [who fails to] or that have been recovered for a violation of a federal fish and game law or regulation, shall, within 30 days after the receipt of such moneys, forward the same to the Division of Fish and [Game within thirty days after receipt of same] Wildlife or the governing body of the small municipality in which the court action took place, as provided in this section.  Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a [misdemeanor] crime of the fourth degree. d.    For the purposes of this section, small municipality means a municipality that has a permanent population of less than 2,000 persons. (cf: P.L.1948, c.448, s.87) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.